Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.161

Manufactured housing communities—Prohibitions of city due to community status as a nonconforming use.

(1) After June 10, 2004, a city may designate a new manufactured housing community as a nonconforming use, but may not order the removal or phased elimination of an existing manufactured housing community because of its status as a nonconforming use.

(2) A city may not prohibit the entry or require the removal of a manufactured/mobile home, park model, or recreational vehicle authorized in a manufactured housing community under chapter 59.20 RCW on the basis of the community's status as a nonconforming use.

[ 2011 c 158 s 9; 2004 c 210 s 1.]

NOTES:

Transfer of residual funds to manufactured home installation training account—2011 c 158: See note following RCW 43.22A.100.